Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 24.2-119.
Restrictions on persons holding other offices serving as member of electoral board, registrar, or officer of election.

No person, nor the deputy of any person, who is employed by or holds any office or post of profit or emolument, or who holds any elective office of profit or trust, under the governments of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any county, city, or town, shall be appointed a member of the electoral board or general registrar. No person, nor the deputy or the employee of any person, who holds any elective office of profit or trust under the government of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any county, city, or town of the Commonwealth, shall be appointed a deputy registrar or officer of election.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-31, 24-198; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-33; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 204; 1986, c. 248; 1993, c. 641; 2022, c. 140.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “a deputy” for “an assistant.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 9.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Part-time town attorney. —

Since a town attorney receives pecuniary gain in return for service as a public official, a town attorney is barred from simultaneous membership on an electoral board by operation of Article II, § 8 and §

24.2-119

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Julia H. Sichol, Commonwealth’s Attorney, Westmoreland County, 16-054, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (9/26/16).

De facto officer doctrine. —

Where a member of a local governmental body vacates his position by acceptance of an incompatible office, the de facto officer doctrine applies to official acts taken by such an individual after he has vacated the first position and thus decisions made by an electoral board during the time of vacancy due to a member’s acceptance of the position of part-time town attorney are valid. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Julia H. Sichol, Commonwealth’s Attorney, Westmoreland County, 16-054, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (9/26/16).

§ 24.2-119.1.
Prohibition on discrimination in employment; penalty.

Any person who serves as a member of a local electoral board, a deputy general registrar, or an officer of election shall neither be discharged from employment nor have any adverse personnel action taken against him, nor shall he be required to use sick leave or vacation time, as a result of his absence from employment due to his service at a polling place on election day or at a meeting of the electoral board following the election to ascertain the results of such election pursuant to §

24.2-671

, provided that he gave reasonable notice to his employer of such service. No such person who serves for four or more hours, including travel time, on his day of service shall be required to start any work shift that begins on or after 5:00 p.m. on the day of his service or begins before 3:00 a.m. on the day following the day of his service. Any employer violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

2020, c. 838; 2022, c. 140.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “a deputy” for “an assistant.”

§ 24.2-120.
Oath of office.

The oath of office for the members of the electoral board, registrars, and officers of election shall be the oath stated in Article II, § 7, of the Constitution. Each member of the electoral board, registrar, and officer of election shall take and sign the oath before performing the duties of his office.

Each member of an electoral board and general registrar shall file the original signed oath in the clerk’s office of the circuit court of his county or city. The general registrar shall file a copy with the secretary of his electoral board.

The oath of office for deputy and substitute registrars, officers of election, and voting equipment custodians may be administered by a general registrar or a notary as well as by persons authorized to administer oaths under §

49-3

.

The oath of office for officers of election may be administered by a member of the electoral board, the general registrar, a deputy or substitute registrar, as well as by notaries and persons authorized to administer oaths under §

49-3

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-29, 24-30, 24-32, 24-33, 24-42, 24-52, 24-52.1, 24-55, 24-61, 24-65, 24-66, 24-118.1, 24-199; 1954, c. 691; 1962, c. 475; 1964, c. 608; 1968, cc. 97, 141; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-29, 24.1-32, 24.1-43; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 204; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 12; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1982, cc. 290, 650; 1983, c. 511; 1984, c. 480; 1985, c. 197; 1986, c. 558; 1988, c. 528; 1989, c. 227; 1993, c. 641; 2005, c. 820; 2012, cc. 328, 486; 2022, c. 140.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 820 added the last paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 328 and 486 are identical, and substituted “registrars, officers of election, and voting equipment custodians may be administered by a general registrar or a notary” for “registrars and for, officers of election may be administered by a notary” in the third paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “deputy” for “assistant” in the third paragraph; and substituted “a deputy” for “an assistant” in the fourth paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-121.
Defense of the electoral board, its members, and the general registrar staff; appointment of counsel.

If any electoral board, any of its members, any general registrar, or any employee of or paid deputy to a registrar is made defendant in any civil action arising out of the performance of his official duties, and does not have legal defense provided under applicable insurance coverage, the officer, employee, or deputy may apply to the Virginia Division of Risk Management to assign counsel for his defense in the action. In such case, and regardless of whether or not the civil action seeks monetary damages, the Division shall obtain one or more attorneys to defend such action, which attorney may be the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth of the particular locality served by the defendant, or one or more private attorneys as may be appropriate. In the case of any private attorney, the Division shall determine the appropriate rate of compensation. All private attorneys’ fees and any expenses incurred in the defense of the action shall be paid from the treasury of the Commonwealth of Virginia.

History.

1986, c. 558, § 24.1-31.1; 1990, c. 201; 1993, c. 641; 2005, cc. 492, 548; 2022, c. 140.

Cross references.

As to risk management plan for public liability, see §

2.2-1837

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 492 and 548 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “deputy” for “assistant” twice.

§ 24.2-122.
Status of members of electoral boards, registrars, and officers of election.

Members of electoral boards, registrars, and officers of election shall serve the Commonwealth and its localities in administering the election laws. They shall be deemed to be employees of the county or city in which they serve except as otherwise specifically provided by state law.

A county or city may retain officers of election as independent contractors.

Deputy registrars who agree to serve without pay are not state or local employees for any purpose.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-30, 24-199; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-32; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1986, c. 558; 1989, c. 227; 1993, c. 641; 2018, c. 675; 2022, c. 140.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions as to electoral boards, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 8.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 675 inserted the second paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “Deputy” for “Assistant” in the last paragraph.

§ 24.2-123.
Requirements for registration and voting; prohibition on use of power of attorney.

No action undertaken to fulfill any requirement of this title to register or vote shall be valid or complete when the action is based on the exercise of a power of attorney, or other writing, in which any principal shall have vested any power or authority in an attorney-in-fact or other agent.

History.

1995, cc. 192, 234.

§ 24.2-124.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to minority language accessibility, see §

24.2-128

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-124

, requiring minority language voting materials in certain covered localities, derived from Acts 2020, c. 719.

§ 24.2-124.1.
Acceptance of certain gifts and funding prohibited.

The State Board, the Department, each local electoral board, and all offices of the general registrar shall not solicit, accept, use, or dispose of any money, grants, property, or services given by a private individual or nongovernmental entity for the purpose of funding voter education and outreach programs, voter registration programs, or any other expense incurred in the conduct of elections.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit (i) the operation of a polling place or voter satellite office in a facility furnished by a private individual or nongovernmental entity that otherwise meets the requirements for polling places provided in §§

24.2-310

and

24.2-310.1

or voter satellite offices provided in §

24.2-701.2

or (ii) acceptance of a federal government grant funded in whole or part by donations from private individuals or nongovernmental entities.

History.

2022, cc. 698, 697.